DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-117
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIEXW-01

DTC C 1269/ 69 Neutral Start Switch Circuit (R Range)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
With the vehicle speed less than 15 km/h (9 mph) when an .
. . . * Neurral start switch
C1269/69 open circuitsignal of R signal is detected for more than 2 ) N
sec. « Neutral start switch circuit (Rrange)
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DI-118 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Startthe inspectionfrom step 1 in case of using the hand -heldtesterandstartfrom step 2in case ofnot

usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Check operation of the neutral start switch (R range) circuit.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Shiftleverintothe Rrange, and read the R signal onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”ON” is displayed.

OK> Check andreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-119
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

2 [ Check neutral start switch (R range) (See page DI-44).

@

3 | Check voltage between terminal R of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body

NG> Repair or replace neutral start switch.

ground.
PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
\Fsss. sha eavestanr] CHECK:
= A | — , (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
W Mw (b) Measure voltage between terminal R of ABS & BA & TRC
/\-/\ & VSC ECU and body ground when shift lever is in R
_( AL/ ) range.
N - Foszos| OK:

Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Go to step 4.

@

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

4 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between neutral start switch (R
range) and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Cgeck and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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